Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.070

Petitions for marketing orders—Public hearing—Legal notice.

(1) The substance of a petition received under RCW 15.66.050 shall be set out in detail and designated as the proposal. A copy of the proposal shall be mailed to all affected parties or producers based on the list provided for in RCW 15.66.060 or 15.66.143, as applicable, and shall be posted on the department's website.

(2) Notice of a public hearing to issue, amend, or terminate a marketing order shall be published in the form of a legal notice for a period of two days in a newspaper of general circulation within the affected areas, as the director may prescribe. The notice must also be posted on the department's website. The director shall mail a copy of the public hearing notice along with a copy of the proposal as provided in subsection (1) of this section to all affected parties or affected producers, as applicable, who may be directly affected by the proposal and whose names and addresses appear on the list compiled under this chapter. The mailing must include the department's website address along with a description of the process for the issuance, amendment, or termination of a marketing order, as applicable.

(3) At a public hearing the director shall receive testimony offered in support of, or opposition to, the proposed issuance of, amendment to, or termination of a marketing order and concerning the terms, conditions, scope, and area thereof. Such hearing shall be public and all testimony shall be received under oath. A full and complete record of all proceedings at such hearings shall be made and maintained on file in the office of the director, which file shall be open to public inspection. The director shall base any findings upon the testimony received at the hearing, together with any other relevant facts available from official publications of institutions of recognized standing. The director shall describe in the findings such official publications upon which any finding is based.

(4) The director shall have the power to subpoena witnesses and to issue subpoenas for the production of any books, records, or documents of any kind.

(5) The superior court of the county in which any hearing or proceeding may be had may compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of records, papers, books, accounts, documents and testimony as required by such subpoena. The director, in case of the refusal of any witness to attest or testify or produce any papers required by the subpoena, shall report to the superior court of the county in which the proceeding is pending by petition setting forth that due notice has been given of the time and place of attendance of the witness or the production of the papers and that the witness has been summoned in the manner prescribed in this chapter and that he or she has failed to attend or produce the papers required by the subpoena at the hearing, cause or proceeding specified in the subpoena, or has refused to answer questions propounded to him or her in the course of such hearing, cause, or proceeding, and shall ask an order of the court to compel a witness to appear and testify before the director. The court upon such petition shall enter an order directing the witness to appear before the court at a time and place to be fixed in such order and then and there to show cause why he or she has not responded to the subpoena. A copy of the order shall be served upon the witness. If it appears to the court that the subpoena was regularly issued, it shall enter an order that the witness appear at the time and place fixed in the order and testify or produce the required papers, and on failing to obey the order the witness shall be dealt with as for contempt of court.

[ 2004 c 179 s 1; 2002 c 313 s 46; 1961 c 11 s 15.66.070. Prior: 1955 c 191 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.